Tennessee, session 114, SB0181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-7-102(b), is amended by deleting
"All appointments shall be subject to review by the joint select committee on veterans services
of the general assembly.".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-7-109, is amended by deleting
"and the joint select committee on veterans services".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0181
000369
- 1 -